Utah statutes.
41-6a-901.   Right-of-way between vehicles -- Unregulated intersection.
(1)  The operator of a vehicle approaching an intersection not regulated by a
traffic-control device shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle that has
entered the intersection from a different highway.
(2)  Except as specified in Subsection (3) and unless otherwise directed by a
peace officer, the operator of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-
of-way to the vehicle on the right when:
(a)  more than one vehicle enters or approaches an intersection from different
highways at approximately the same time; and
(b)  the intersection:
(i)  is not regulated by a traffic-control device;
(ii)  is not regulated because the traffic-control signal is inoperative; or
(iii)  is regulated from all directions by stop signs.
(3)  The operator of a vehicle approaching an intersection not regulated by a
traffic-control device:
(a)  from a highway that does not continue beyond the intersection, shall
yield the right-of-way to the operator of any vehicle on the intersecting
highway; and
(b)  from a highway that is not paved, shall yield the right-of-way to the
operator of any vehicle on a paved intersecting highway.
